California statutes. Insurance Code
The insurance products listed in Section 1758.85 that are sold in conjunction with a vehicle rental are not transferable and do not apply to any vehicle not listed in the rental contract issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.86.

A car rental agent shall not sell insurance pursuant to this article unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The rental period of the rental agreement does not exceed 30 consecutive days, except for any renewals or extension of the original rental period.

(b) The car rental agent provides brochures or other written materials to the prospective renter that do all of the following:

(1) Summarize the material terms and conditions of coverage offered to renters, including the identity of the insurer.

(2) Describe the process for filing a
 claim, including a toll-free telephone number to report a claim.

(3) Disclose any additional information on the price, benefits, exclusions, conditions, or other limitations of those policies that the commissioner may by rule prescribe.

(4) Provide the licensee’s name, address, telephone number, and license number, as well as the availability of the department’s toll-free consumer hotline.

(c) The car rental agent or its endorsee makes all of the following disclosures to the renter, which shall be acknowledged in writing by the renter, or displayed by clear and conspicuous signs that are posted at every location where rental agreements are executed, such as the counter where the renter signs the rental agreement:

(1) That the purchase by the renter of
 the kinds of insurance prescribed in this article is not required in order to rent a vehicle.

(2) That the insurance policies offered by the car rental agent may provide a duplication of coverage already provided by a renter’s personal automobile insurance policy or by another source of coverage.

(3) That the endorsee on the car rental agent’s license is not qualified or authorized to evaluate the adequacy of the purchaser’s existing insurance coverages.

(d) Evidence of coverage is stated on the face of the rental agreement or evidence of coverages provided to every renter who elects to purchase that coverage is indicated to the renter.

(e) The insurance is provided under an individual policy issued to the purchaser, or under a group, or master policy
 issued to an organization licensed as a car rental agent by an insurer authorized to transact the applicable kinds or types of insurance in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 37.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.861.

A licensee shall not be required to treat moneys collected from renters purchasing insurance, pursuant to this article, as funds received in a fiduciary capacity if the insurer represented by the licensee has provided in writing that the funds need not be segregated from funds received by the rental car company on account of vehicle rental and the charges for insurance coverage are itemized and incorporated as part of the rental agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.87.

A car rental agent shall not do any of the following:

(a) Offer to sell insurance except in conjunction with, and incidental to, authorized rental agreements.

(b) Advertise, represent, or otherwise portray itself or its employees or endorsees as licensed insurers, life agents, property broker-agents, or casualty broker-agents.

(c) Pay an endorsee any compensation, fee, or commission dependent on the placement of insurance under the agent’s license. Nothing in this code shall prohibit the payment of a “performance-related incentive.” For the purposes of this subdivision, a “performance-related incentive” is not a commission as otherwise defined. A
 “performance-related incentive” is money or other tangible or intangible items of value paid or given to any endorsee of the licensee which is not based solely on the offering or selling of the insurance products listed in Section 1758.85.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 38.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.88.

Any insurer that provides insurance to be sold by a rental car company or franchisee of a rental car company under this article shall file a copy of any individual policy issued to a purchaser, or any policy or certificate issued under a group or master policy to an organization licensed as a car rental agent, with the commissioner, who shall make that policy available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 39.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.89.

As used in this article, the following definitions have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “License period” means all of that two-year period beginning as described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), as applicable, and ending the second succeeding year on the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued.

(2) A license period shall be determined for each person as follows:

(A) Upon initial licensing, the license period starts on the date the license is issued.

(B) Subsequently, the license period
 starts the first day of the month following the month in which the initial license was issued.

(3) A license is required to be renewed on or before the expiration date of the license period.

(b) “Rental vehicle” or “vehicle” means a motor vehicle operated by a driver who is not required to possess a commercial driver’s license to operate the motor vehicle and the motor vehicle is either of the following:

(1) A private passenger motor vehicle, including a passenger van, minivan, or sports utility vehicle.

(2) A cargo vehicle, including a cargo van, pickup truck, or truck with a gross vehicle weight of less than 26,000 pounds.

(c) “Renter” means any person who obtains the use of a vehicle
 from a rental car company under the terms of a rental agreement.

(d) “Rental car company” means any person in the business of renting vehicles to the public.

(e) “Rental agreement” means any written agreement setting forth the terms and conditions governing the use of a vehicle provided by the rental car company.

(f) “Car rental agent” means a person or organization licensed pursuant to this article to offer insurance in connection with and incidental to rental car agreements on behalf of an insurer authorized to write those types of insurance in this state.

(g) “Endorsee” means an unlicensed employee of a car rental agent who meets the requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 40.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.891.

Until January 1, 2001, a rental car company or a franchisee of a rental car company shall not be required to obtain a license to offer the insurance products described in Section 1758.85.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16.7. Credit Insurance Agents [1758.9. - 1758.993.]

1758.9.

No person shall sell or solicit any form of credit insurance in this state unless that person is licensed as an insurance agent or broker pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1631) or is licensed as a credit insurance agent or endorsee under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 19.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.91.

The commissioner may issue to an applicant that has complied with the requirements of this article, a credit insurance agent license to offer or sell those types of insurance specified in Section 1758.96 in connection with, and incidental to, a loan or extension of credit, on behalf of any insurer authorized to write those types of insurance in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 321, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.92.

(a) An applicant for a credit insurance agent license under this article shall submit each of the following to the commissioner:

(1) A written application for licensure signed by the applicant or an officer of the applicant, in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(2) A certificate by the insurer that is to be named in the credit insurance agent license, stating that the insurer has satisfied itself that the named applicant is trustworthy and competent to act as its insurance agent limited to this purpose and that the insurer will appoint the applicant to act as its agent in reference to selling or soliciting
 the kind or kinds of insurance that are permitted by this article, if the credit insurance agent license applied for is issued by the commissioner. The certification shall be subscribed by an officer or managing agent of the insurer on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

(3) An application fee, and, for each license period thereafter, a renewal fee, of four hundred eight dollars ($408).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the provisions set forth in Sections 1667, 1668, 1668.5, 1669, 1670, 1720, 1738, and 1739 apply to any application for or issuance of a license, or any application for or approval of an endorsee, pursuant to this article.

(c) (1) Not less than 60 days before a
 permanent license will expire, the commissioner may use an electronic delivery method, including email or other similar electronic method of delivery, to deliver, or may mail, to the latest email or mailing address appearing on the commissioner’s records, an application to the licensee to renew the license for the appropriate succeeding license period. It is the licensee’s responsibility to renew whether or not a renewal application is received. The commissioner may accept a late renewal without penalty, provided the licensee’s failure to comply is due to a clerical error or inadvertence on the part of the department.

(2) An application for renewal shall be filed on or before the expiration date.

(3) The application for renewal of an expired license may be filed after the
 expiration date and until that same month and date of the next succeeding year. A licensee who files a renewal application after the license has expired shall be charged, in addition to the renewal fee, a penalty of 50 percent of the renewal fee for the credit insurance agent license and all endorsees.

(d) Costs associated with any enforcement action or investigation shall be paid for by the person or organization licensed pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 37.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.93.

(a) An employee of an organization that has been issued a credit insurance agent license pursuant to this article may be an endorsee on the license if all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The employee is 18 years of age or older.

(2) The employee submits an application to the department that includes a signed affidavit, in a form prescribed by the commissioner, stating the applicant has read the credit insurance training material submitted to the commissioner and that the applicant has received from the organization training in, and is knowledgeable about, the credit insurance products to be sold, ethics, and market practices.

(3) The employee submits an application fee, and each year thereafter, a renewal fee, in an amount or amounts determined by the department as sufficient to defray the department’s actual costs of processing the application or renewal and implementing this article.

(b) Prior to allowing any endorsee to offer or sell credit-related insurance, the licensed organization shall provide training to each endorsee about the credit insurance products to be sold, and shall submit annually to the department the names of endorsees and a statement of compliance with this article. Training materials used by the organization to train endorsees shall be submitted to the department at the time the organization applies for its credit insurance agent license, and each year thereafter when that license is renewed. Any changes to previously submitted training materials shall be submitted to the department with the changes highlighted 30 days prior to their use by the licensee. Training materials and changes to those materials submitted to the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed approved for use by the company unless it is notified by the department to the contrary. Failure by a credit insurance licensee to submit training materials or changes for departmental review or use of unapproved or disapproved training materials shall constitute grounds for denial of an application for a license, nonrenewal of a license, or suspension of a license, as appropriate.

(c) The credit insurance agent shall periodically retrain its endorsees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 321, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.94.

(a) The manager at each business location of an organization licensed as a credit insurance agent, shall be listed as an endorsee on the organization’s license and shall be responsible for the training and supervision of each additional endorsee at that location. Each licensee shall identify the endorsee who is the manager at each location for the purposes of this article.

(b) An employee of a credit insurance agent who complies with the requirements of Section 1758.93, and is endorsed on the license of the credit insurance agent, may act on behalf of, and under the supervision of, the credit insurance agent in matters relating to transacting insurance under that agent’s license. The conduct of an endorsee of a credit insurance agent acting within the scope of employment or agency shall be deemed the conduct of the credit insurance agent for purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 321, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.95.

(a) If a licensee or endorsee violates any provision of this article or any other provision of this code, the commissioner may do either of the following:

(1) After notice and hearing, suspend or revoke the license of the credit insurance agent.

(2) After notice and hearing, impose other penalties that the commissioner deems necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes of this code, including suspending the privilege of transacting credit insurance pursuant to this article at specific business locations where violations have occurred, imposing fines on the credit
 insurance agent, individual endorsees or endorsee managers, and suspending or revoking the endorsement of a named endorsee or endorsee manager.

(b) If any person or persons sell insurance in connection with or incidental to a loan or other extension of credit or hold themselves or an organization out as a credit insurance agent without obtaining the license required by this article, as being an endorsee when that person is not an endorsee, or as being licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1631) without obtaining that license, the commissioner may issue a cease and desist order pursuant to Section 12921.8.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of Section 1748.5 are applicable to both the organization issued a license pursuant to
 this article and any endorsee to that license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 38.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.96.

A person licensed pursuant to this article may act as a credit insurance agent for an authorized insurer only with respect to the kinds of insurance specified in this section sold in connection with and incidental to a loan or other extension of credit other than a loan in excess of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) relating to or secured by real property where the repayment period does not exceed 10 years. The sale of credit insurance products as specified in this section in excess of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) relating to or secured by real property where any compensation, fee, or commission is paid dependent on the placement of credit insurance, requires a license to act as an insurance agent or life agent pursuant to Section 1621 or 1622.

(a) Credit life insurance.

(b) Credit disability insurance.

(c) Credit involuntary unemployment insurance or credit loss-of-income insurance.

(d) Credit property insurance.

(e) Guaranteed asset protection (GAP) insurance.

(f) Any other form of insurance declared by the commissioner to be subject to this section pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1758.992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 24, Sec. 1.   (AB 125)   Effective May 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.97.

A credit insurance agent shall not sell or offer to sell insurance pursuant to this article unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The credit insurance agent provides brochures or other written materials to the prospective purchaser that do all of the following:

(1) Summarize the material terms and conditions of coverage offered, including the identity of the insurer.

(2) Describe the process for filing a claim, including a toll-free telephone number to report a claim.

(3) Disclose any additional information on the price, benefits,
 exclusions, conditions, or other limitations of those policies that the commissioner may by rule prescribe.

(b) The credit insurance agent makes all of the following disclosures, either with or as part of each individual policy or group certificate, or with a notice of proposed insurance, or, if the insurance is sold at the same time and place as the related credit transaction, in a statement acknowledged by the purchaser in writing on a separate form, electronically, digitally, or by audio recording:

(1) That the purchase of the kinds of insurance prescribed in this article is not required in order to secure the loan or an extension of credit.

(2) That the insurance coverage offered by the credit insurance agent may provide a duplication of coverage already provided by a purchaser’s other personal insurance policies
 or by another source of coverage.

(3) That the endorsee is not qualified or authorized to evaluate the adequacy of the purchaser’s existing coverages, unless the individual is licensed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1631).

(4) That the customer may cancel the insurance at any time. If the customer cancels within 30 days from the delivery of the insurance policy, certificate, or notice of proposed insurance, the premium will be refunded in full. If the customer cancels at any time thereafter, any unearned premium will be refunded in accordance with applicable law.

(c) Evidence of coverage is provided to every person who elects to purchase that coverage.

(d) Costs for the insurance are separately itemized in any loan, credit, or retail
 agreement.

(e) The insurance is provided under an individual policy issued to the purchaser or under a group or master policy issued to the organization licensed as a credit insurance agent by an insurer authorized to transact the applicable kinds or types of insurance in this state. Any of the conditions and disclosures specified in this section shall be deemed satisfied if the consumer is otherwise provided with the information required in this section by any other disclosures required by existing federal or state law or regulations.

No statement, disclosure, or notice made for the purpose of compliance with this section shall be construed to cause the policy form, certificate of insurance, or notice of proposed insurance, by themselves, to be considered nonstandard forms, as described in Article 6.9 (commencing with Section 2249) of Subchapter 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of
 Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 69.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.98.

Under the authority of the credit insurance agent license, a credit insurance agent shall not do any of the following:

(a) Offer to sell insurance except in conjunction with, and incidental to, a loan or extension of credit.

(b) Advertise, represent, or otherwise portray itself or its employees, agents, or endorsees as licensed insurers, life agents, property broker-agents, or casualty broker-agents.

(c) Pay any unlicensed person any compensation, fee, or commission dependent on the placement of insurance under the agent’s license. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit
 production payments or incentive payments to an endorsee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 51.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.99.

An organization licensed as a credit insurance agent shall prominently display its license number and the department’s toll free consumer hot line telephone number on brochures and information sheets required by this article and on any evidence of insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 321, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.991.

Any insurer that provides insurance to be sold by an organization licensed as a credit insurance agent shall file a copy of any individual policy issued to a purchaser, or any policy or certificate issued under a group or master policy to an organization licensed as a credit agent, with the commissioner, who shall make that policy available to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 321, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative January 1, 2002, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.992.

As used in this article, the following definitions have the following meanings:

(a) “Enrollment” means the process of soliciting or accepting enrollments or applications from a debtor under a credit insurance policy, which includes informing the debtor of the availability of coverage, calculating the insurance charge, preparing and delivering the certificate of insurance or notice of proposed insurance, answering questions regarding the coverage, or otherwise assisting the debtor in making an informed decision whether or not to elect to purchase credit insurance.

(b) “Creditor” means a lender of money or a vendor or lessor of goods, services, property, rights, or privileges, for
 which payment is arranged through a credit transaction, or any successor to the right, title, or interest of that lender, vendor, or lessor, and any affiliate, associate, subsidiary, subcontractor, director, officer, or employee of any of them or any other person in any way associated with any of them.

(c) “Credit insurance agent license” means an agent license issued to an individual or organization for the enrollment and sale of credit insurance.

(d) (1) “Credit insurance” includes credit life insurance, credit disability insurance, credit involuntary unemployment insurance, credit loss-of-income insurance, credit property insurance, or guaranteed asset protection (GAP) insurance.

(2) Credit insurance also includes any other form of insurance offered in connection with an extension of credit
 that is limited to partially or wholly extinguishing that credit obligation that the commissioner determines should be designated a form of credit insurance.

(3) The commissioner may adopt, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out this subdivision.

(e) (1) “Credit life insurance” means insurance on the life of a debtor pursuant to or in connection with a specific loan or other credit transaction, exclusive of any insurance procured at no expense to the debtor. Insurance shall be deemed procured at no expense to the debtor unless the cost of the credit transaction to the debtor varies depending on whether or not the insurance is procured.

(2) “Credit disability
 insurance” means insurance on a debtor to provide indemnity for payments becoming due on a specific loan or other credit transaction while the debtor is disabled, as defined in the policy, exclusive of any insurance procured at no expense to the debtor. Insurance shall be deemed to have been procured at no expense to the debtor unless the cost of the credit transaction to the debtor varies depending on whether or not the insurance is procured.

(f) “Credit involuntary unemployment insurance” or “credit loss-of-income insurance” means insurance issued to provide indemnity for payments becoming due on a specific loan or other credit transaction while the debtor is involuntarily unemployed, as defined in the policy.

(g) “Credit property insurance” means insurance that provides coverage (1) on personal property pledged or offered as collateral for securing a personal or consumer loan,
 or (2) on personal property purchased under an installment sales agreement or through a consumer credit transaction, but does not include any insurance that provides theft, collision, liability, property damage, or comprehensive insurance coverage in any automobile or any other self-propelled vehicle that is designed primarily for operation in the air or on the highways, waterways, or sea, and its operating equipment, or that is necessitated by reason of the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, operation, maintenance, or use of those vehicles. However, that excluded insurance does include single interest coverage on any of those vehicles that insures the interest of the creditor in the same manner as collateral secures a loan.

(h) (1) “Guaranteed asset protection” (GAP) insurance means insurance in which a person agrees to indemnify a vehicle purchaser or lessee for some or all of the amount
 owed on the vehicle at the time of an unrecovered theft or total loss, after credit for money received from the purchaser’s or lessee’s physical damage insurer, pursuant to the terms of a loan, lease agreement, or conditional sales contract used to purchase or lease the vehicle. GAP insurance, whether sold by a credit insurance agent or another type of licensee authorized to sell GAP insurance, may also include a promise to pay up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) to an insured, in addition to the sum needed to indemnify the insured for the amount owed, to purchase or lease another vehicle.

(2) GAP insurance does not include, and no insurance license of any type under this code is required to offer, any of the following:

(A) A debt cancellation agreement contained in a conditional sales contract for the sale of a vehicle by a licensed motor vehicle dealer, or a debt cancellation
 agreement contained in a lease agreement for the lease of a vehicle by a licensed motor vehicle dealer or leasing company, to waive some or all of either of the following:

(i) The difference between the actual cash value of the purchaser’s or lessee’s vehicle at the time of an unrecovered theft or total loss and the amount owed on the vehicle pursuant to the terms of a lease agreement or conditional sales contract used to purchase or lease the vehicle.

(ii) The amount owed on the vehicle at the time of an unrecovered theft or total loss, after credit for money received from the purchaser’s or lessee’s physical damage insurer or from a third-party liability insurer. Such a promise may also include a promise to waive some or all of the amount of the purchaser’s or lessee’s deductible.

(B) A promise by a lender as part
 of a debt obligation to purchase or lease a vehicle in which the lender agrees to waive some or all of either of the following:

(i) The difference between the actual cash value of the purchaser’s or lessee’s vehicle at the time of an unrecovered theft or total loss and the amount owed on the vehicle pursuant to the terms of the debt obligation used to purchase or lease the vehicle.

(ii) The amount owed on the vehicle at the time of an unrecovered theft or total loss, after credit for money received from the purchaser’s or lessee’s physical damage insurer or from a third-party liability insurer. Such a promise may also include a promise to waive some or all of the amount of the purchaser’s or lessee’s deductible.

(C) Coverage under subparagraphs (A) and (B) may not result in a credit balance in favor of the vehicle
 purchaser or lessee or include a promise to pay money to a vehicle purchaser or lessee in addition to waiving some or all of the amount owed, including some or all of the amount of the purchaser’s or lessee’s deductible. For purposes of this paragraph, a promise to pay money does not include, and a dealer, creditor, or lender shall be allowed to offer, a discount or credit to a purchaser or lessee as an incentive for purchasing, leasing, or financing a replacement vehicle. However, the dealer, creditor, or lender shall require the purchaser or lessee to use the discount or credit on a purchase or lease from the dealer or lessor that sold or leased the original vehicle to the purchaser or lessee, or with the creditor or lender that financed the purchase or lease of the original vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (AB 125)   Effective May 10, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.993.

Nothing in this article regulating the sale of credit insurance shall be construed to impair or impede the application of any other law regulating the sale of credit insurance, including, but not limited to, the California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) of the Financial Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 75.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5A. Administrators [1759. - 1759.10.]

1759.

For purposes of this chapter, “administrator” means any person who collects any charge or premium from, or who adjusts or settles claims on, residents of this state in connection with life or health insurance coverage or annuities or coverage described in Section 740 other than any of the following:

(a) An employer on behalf of its employees or the employees of one or more subsidiary or affiliated corporations of that employer.

(b) A union on behalf of its members.

(c) An insurance company which is either licensed in this state or acting as an insurer with respect to a policy lawfully issued and delivered by it in and pursuant to the laws of a state in which the insurer was authorized to do an insurance business or prepaid hospital or health care service plan (including their sales representatives licensed in this state when engaged in the performance of their duties).

(d) A life or health agent or broker licensed in this state, whose activities are limited exclusively to the sale of insurance.

(e) A creditor on behalf of its debtors with respect to insurance covering a debt between the creditor and its debtors.

(f) A trust, its trustees, agents, and employees acting thereunder, established in conformity with 29 U.S.C. Sec. 186.

(g) A trust exempt from taxation under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, its trustees, and employees acting thereunder, or a custodian, its agents and employees acting pursuant to a custodian account which meets the requirements of Section 401(f) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(h) A bank, credit union or other financial institution which is subject to supervision or examination by federal or state regulatory authorities.

(i) A company which advances for and collects any premium or charge from its credit card holders who have authorized it to do so, provided the company does not adjust or settle claims.

(j) A person who adjusts or settles claims in the normal course of his or her practice or employment as an attorney at law, and who does not collect any charge or premium in connection with life or health insurance coverage or annuities. 

(k) An adjuster licensed by the Insurance Commissioner when engaged in the performance of his or her duties.

(l) A nonprofit agricultural association.

(m) Any person or entity subject to regulation under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 947, Sec. 4.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.1.

No administrator shall act as such without a written agreement between the administrator and the insurer, and such written agreement shall be retained as part of the official records of both the insurer and the administrator for the duration of the agreement and five years thereafter. Such written agreement shall contain provisions which include the requirements of Sections 1759.2 to 1759.8, inclusive, except insofar as those requirements do not apply to the functions performed by the administrator.

Where a policy is issued to a trustee or trustees, a copy of the trust agreement and any amendments thereto shall be furnished to the insurer by the administrator and shall be retained as part of the official records of both the insurer and the administrator for the duration of the policy and five years thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 998.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.2.

Whenever an insurer utilizes the services of an administrator under the terms of a written contract as required in Section 1759.1, the payment to the administrator of any premiums or charges for insurance by or on behalf of the insured shall be deemed to have been received by the insurer, and the payment of return premiums or claims by the insurer to the administrator shall not be deemed payment to the insured or claimant until such payments are received by the insured or claimant. Nothing herein shall limit any right of the insurer against the administrator resulting from its failure to make payments to the insurer, insureds or claimants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 998.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.3.

(a) Every administrator shall maintain at its principal administrative office for the duration of the written agreement referred to in Section 1759.1 and five years thereafter adequate books and records of all transactions between it, and insurers and insured persons. The books and records shall be maintained in accordance with prudent standards of insurance recordkeeping. The insurer shall retain the right to continuing access to the books and records of the administrator sufficient to permit the insurer to fulfill all of its contractual obligations to insured persons, subject to any restrictions in the written agreement between the insurer and administrator on the proprietary rights of the parties in the books and records.

(b) The commissioner shall have access to the books and records for the purpose of examination, audit, and inspection. Any information contained in the books and records, including, but not limited to, the identity and addresses of policyholders and certificateholders, shall be confidential, except the commissioner may use the information in any proceedings instituted against the administrator. 

(c) The commissioner may, after notice and hearing, promulgate reasonable rules and regulations specifying the manner and type of records to be maintained by administrators.

(d) Every administrator shall keep and maintain the books and records required by this section and the regulations promulgated pursuant to this section. Failure to keep or maintain the books and records as required shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the certificate of registration of the administrator. The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 563, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.4.

An administrator may use only such advertising pertaining to the business underwritten by an insurer as has been approved by such insurer in advance of its use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 998.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.5.

The agreement shall make provision with respect to the underwriting or other standards pertaining to the business underwritten by such insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 998.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.6.

All insurance charges or premiums collected by an administrator on behalf of or for an insurer or insurers, and return premiums received from such insurer or insurers, shall be held by the administrator in a fiduciary capacity. Such funds shall be immediately remitted to the person or persons entitled thereto, or shall be deposited promptly in a fiduciary bank account established and maintained by the administrator. If charges or premiums so deposited have been collected on behalf of or for more than one insurer, the administrator shall keep records clearly recording the deposits in and withdrawals from such account on behalf of or for each insurer. The administrator shall keep copies of all such records and, upon request of an insurer, shall furnish such insurer with copies of such records pertaining to deposits and withdrawals on behalf of or for such insurer. The administrator shall not pay any claim on behalf of or for such insurer by withdrawals from such fiduciary account. Withdrawals from such account shall be made, as provided in the written agreement between the administrator and the insurer, for (1) remittance to an insurer entitled thereto; (2) deposit in an account maintained in the name of such insurer; (3) transfer to and deposit in a claims paying account, with claims on behalf of or for such insurer to be paid as provided in Section 1759. 7; (4) payment to a group policyholder for remittance to the insurer entitled thereto; (5) payment to the administrator of its commission, fees or charges; or (6) remittance of return premiums to the person or persons entitled thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 280.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.7.

All claims paid by the administrator from funds collected on behalf of the insurer shall be paid only on checks or drafts of, or, with the consent of the insured, by an electronic funds transfer from, and as authorized by the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 433, Sec. 12.   (AB 328)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.8.

With respect to any policies where an administrator adjusts or settles claims, the compensation to the administrator with regard to such policies shall in no way be contingent on claim experience.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 998.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.9.
